California, session 20252026, SB895.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The People of the State of California find and declare the following:(a) Since World War II, the United States has been a global leader in scientific and health research and innovation. Through the financial support of governmental agencies including, but not limited to, the National Science Foundation (NSF), the National Institutes of Health (NIH), the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), the scientific and health communities have been able to create life-enhancing scientific, biomedical, and public health discoveries.(b) Americans have benefited enormously from that research with improved health, cures for diseases, vaccines, and improved air quality and environment. The United States economy has benefited greatly from that research as well.(c) California produces an astonishing share of the top scientific research on the planet. It is estimated that $3 of every $10 in federal research investments are drawn to California. The state accounts for about 47 percent of United States biotechnology research and development spending and generates about 53 percent of the nation’s biotechnology revenues. Nearly one-half of all venture capital in the United States is invested in California. That success is driven in large part by the state’s world-class universities and research institutions. The University of California is the top research institution in the world for United States patent generation. Every dollar invested in science funding generates more than $2 in economic activity.(d) Federal research funding has been integral in supporting the work of public and private research institutions in California. For example, federal funding supports a significant part of the University of California’s (UC) and California State University’s (CSU) research operations. Federal grants pay for faculty research and the salaries of graduate and postdoctoral student researchers. Federal research grants totaled more than $5,000,000,000 to the University of California in the 2023–24 fiscal year. Public and private university research has led to the founding of thousands of startups, driving economic expansion and technological innovation. Federal funding reductions limit research opportunities and may impede California’s competitiveness and economic progress.(e) Because the federal government has been one of the largest funders of scientific research in California, foundations, nonprofits, and corporations alone cannot make up the gap when cuts are made by the federal government. Unless the people of California rise up, much of this critical work may come to a halt. Federal cuts to scientific research pose a threat to the well-being of the people of California and will impair California’s ability to operate as a global leader in technology, innovation, and research across fields of study.(f) The people of California propose this ballot measure to create the California Foundation for Science and Health Research (Foundation) to award grants and make loans to public and private universities, research companies, institutes, and health care organizations in California for scientific and health care research and development.(g) Through the Foundation, funding would be distributed to UC, CSU, other California universities, and public and private entities engaged in critical science and health research. It would provide funding for staff, equipment, and facilities needed to carry out scientific research in fields including, but not limited to, public health, mental health, heart disease, cancer treatment, diabetes, Alzheimer’s disease, Parkinson’s disease, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, strokes, child and adult leukemia, infectious diseases, and HIV/AIDS. Priority would be given to established research projects where the federal government has canceled funding. The measure would require annual audits.(h) This measure will help preserve California’s position as a global leader in scientific innovation. This measure would allow important research to continue regardless of what happens at the federal level. This measure will ensure that California is not left behind.(i) This measure will help sustain and grow the workforce of the state, with runoff economic benefits that will ensure a thriving future for Californians. This measure will support thousands of students and researchers at California universities in good-paying union jobs in growing industries. Supporting good-paying jobs in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics will help keep California economically competitive and generate billions of dollars each year in economic growth.(j) There is some science that only public institutions will take on, for example cancer drug trials that combine drugs from different pharmaceutical companies, or as yet, unproven technologies in renewable energy. This measure would continue funding scientific research that looks beyond the profit motive for the greater good.(k) California’s university and college system is a model for universities everywhere, involving students closely in practical, life-saving research. Cuts to federal funding threaten our students’ ability to learn the research skills they need to succeed. This measure will preserve California’s university and college system as a pathway to the middle class for California students.(l) Too many Californians are driven into homelessness by drug abuse and mental health issues. This measure will help address this problem by continuing to fund critical research on promising mental health and addiction treatments.(m) This measure contains strict fiscal accountability and transparency standards, including annual independent audits and public disclosure of all funding to ensure that Legislative allocations and bond funding is spent effectively, efficiently, and as promised.SEC. 2. Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 11899) is added to Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 12. California Science and Health Research Bond Act Article 1. California Foundation for Science and Health Research11899. As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meaning:(a) “Act” means the California Science and Health Research Bond Act constituting this chapter.(b) “Benefit fund” means the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Benefit Fund created pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11899.2. (b)(c) “Committee” means the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Finance Committee created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11899.16. 11899.15.(c)(d) “Council” means the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Council created pursuant to Section 11899.3.(d)(e) “Foundation” means the California Foundation for Science and Health Research established pursuant to Section 11899.1.(e)(f) “Fund” means the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund created pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11899.2.(f)“Interim debt” means any interim loans pursuant to Sections 11899.20 and 11899.21, bond anticipation notes or commercial paper notes issued to make deposits into the fund, and which will be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11899.10).11899.1. (a) The California Foundation for Science and Health Research is established within the Government Operations Agency.(b) The foundation’s role is to facilitate scientific research by awarding grants and making loans to public or private research companies, universities, institutes, and organizations for scientific research and development and to construct facilities for research and development, including, but not limited to, any of the following fields:(1) Biomedical, including finding cures for high mortality diseases, including, but not limited to, cancer, Alzheimer’s disease, Parkinson’s disease, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, heart disease, strokes, child and adult leukemia, infectious diseases, and HIV/AIDS. HIV/AIDS, and genetic and chronic diseases that affect children and infants.(2) Detecting Public health, including, but not limited to, detecting and responding to new and emerging health threats.(3) Disease prevention, including, but not limited to, cancer, Alzheimer’s disease, Parkinson’s disease, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, heart disease, strokes, child and adult leukemia, infectious diseases, and HIV/AIDS.(4) Promoting healthy and safe behaviors, communities, and environment.(5) Wildfire prevention.(6) Behavioral health, including, but not limited to, addiction and substance use disorders.(7) Climate, including climate change and its impact on human health.(8) Weather.(9) Ocean.(10) Coastal and marine ecosystems and resources.(11) Agriculture and water.(12) Emerging technologies.(13) Safety, efficacy, and security of drugs, biological products, medical devices, our nation’s food supply, and cosmetics.(c) (1) The Secretary of Government Operations shall oversee the process of appointing the director of the foundation and shall set the level of salaries, bonuses, and benefits for the director. The task of hiring and determining the salaries, bonuses, and benefits of additional personnel may be delegated by the secretary to the director, subject to approval and oversight by the secretary.(2) The director and personnel of the foundation shall be responsible for implementing the strategic objectives of the council, administering the grants and loans awarded by the council, and all other duties as deemed necessary for the operation of the foundation.11899.2.(a)(1)Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds shall be deposited into the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.(2)The California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund may be funded by both private and public funds, including private donations.11899.2. (a) (1) The California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the fund pursuant to Section 11899.10.(2) (A) The California Foundation for Science and Health Research Benefit Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.(B) The benefit fund shall consist solely of private donations.(C) All moneys in the benefit fund, notwithstanding Section 13340, are hereby continuously appropriated without respect to fiscal years for the purposes of this chapter. Moneys in the benefit fund shall be made available for the same purposes as the moneys in the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund.(b) The proceeds of interim debt and bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11899.10) this chapter shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund, except as stated in Section 11899.13. Fund.(c) Moneys in the fund shall be used by the foundation to award public and private grants to, and make loans to, public or private research companies, universities, institutes, and organizations for scientific research and development, including, but not limited to, research in any of the fields described in subdivision (b) of Section 11899.1.(d) (1) All research and development funded by the fund shall be conducted under established standards of open scientific exchange, peer review, and public oversight, including, but not limited to, the California Taxpayer Access to Publicly Funded Research Act (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 13989) of Part 4.5), if applicable.(2) All grants or loans provided under this section shall be awarded or made available to researchers or projects located within this state, except that funding for research collaboratives between California and out-of-state researchers shall be permitted.(3) All grants or loans provided under this section shall be awarded based on both of the following:(A) Consistency with the research priorities established for the foundation by the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Council as described in subdivision (a) of Section 11899.3.(B) The scientific merit of the proposed research, as determined by an open, competitive, scientific peer review process that ensures objectivity, consistency, and high quality, as described in Section 11899.4.(4) The foundation shall prioritize funding research that replaces funding cuts by the federal government.(5) To be eligible for funding, all research projects submitted for potential funding shall be reviewed and approved by an institutional review board that meets the requirements of applicable laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, the California Taxpayer Access to Publicly Funded Research Act (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 13989) of Part 4.5) and the Protection of Human Subjects in Medical Experimentation Act (Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 24170) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code).(e) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the foundation include provisions in the grants, loans, and contracts to recoup a portion of licensing and royalty fees from inventions and technologies produced as a result of bond-funded research, and that pharmaceuticals developed through this research are available to Californians at a discount.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that under certain circumstances, California will be able to publicly produce pharmaceuticals invented with bond-funded research via CalRx in order to sell them at a discount to Californians and for profit to other states.(3) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that the foundation draw upon the greatest successes in American history in order to be equipped to solve the most pressing problems facing California and the nation.(B) In furtherance of subparagraph (A), it is the intent of the Legislature that the foundation accomplish all of the following:(i) Learn from the most ambitious research models of the past century, including the DARPA/ARPA model and Operation Warp Speed.(ii) Support a greater diversity of ideas by allocating funding for projects that are riskier than those typically funded by federal agencies and by ensuring that early career scientists, including scientists under 40 and scientists fewer than 10 years since completing their PhDs, are supported by the foundation.(iii) Create award approval systems that are efficient and not overly reliant on paperwork, freeing up scientists to spend more time doing critical work.(f) Not more than three 3 percent of the moneys in the fund shall be used for administrative costs. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Salaries, bonuses, and benefits paid or incurred with respect to the hiring or retention of a director of the foundation and other officers and administrative staff that shall work on behalf of the foundation under the supervision of the director.(2) Legal and accounting fees and expenses.(3) All costs associated with the establishment and operation of the foundation, including, but not limited to, office rent, overhead, information technology and data systems, office supplies and equipment, clerical services, utilities, telephone, travel, repairs and maintenance, program audits, and other general costs of operating the foundation.(g) All intellectual property assets developed using funds authorized for, or made available to, the foundation shall be treated pursuant to state and federal law.(h) The foundation shall recommend to the council, and the council shall adopt, standards to ensure that if the grantee or loan recipient purchases goods or services using funds authorized for, or made available to, the foundation, the goods or services purchased are from California suppliers to the extent reasonably possible, in a good faith effort to achieve a goal of more than 50 percent of purchases from California suppliers.11899.3. (a) There is hereby established the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Council that shall do all of the following:(1) Develop the strategic objectives and research priorities of the foundation.(2) Actively participate in the overall management of the foundation.(3) Determine which research projects will be funded by the fund based on the research priorities established for the foundation pursuant to paragraph (1) and the technical merits of the proposals, as determined by scientific peer review panels created pursuant to subdivision (e).(b) (1) The council shall consist of 11 to 13 members.(A) Seven members shall be appointed by the Secretary of Government Operations.(i) Five members shall be scientists or hold backgrounds in science or research, including at least one member who is a graduate-level researcher and at least one member who is a postdoctoral scholar, with current or past research experience in the fields described in subdivision (b) of Section 11899.1.(ii) One member shall hold a background in economics.(iii) One member shall be a patient advocate.(B) One member shall be a health care provider appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.(C) One member shall be an advocate in climate or environmental fields appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(D) One member shall be the chief executive officer of the California Council on Science and Technology, or their designee.(E) One member shall be a designee of the President of the University of California, if the president chooses to designate a representative, who shall be a scientist or hold a background in science or research.(F) One member shall be a designee of the Chancellor of the California State University, if the chancellor chooses to designate a representative, who shall be a scientist or hold a background in science or research.(G) One member shall be the President of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities, or the president’s designee, who shall be a scientist or hold a background in science or research.(2) (A) Individuals and organizations may submit nominations for membership to the Secretary of Government Operations.(B) The Secretary of Government Operations may solicit nominations from relevant organizations and individuals.(3) Any appointees to the council shall not be subject to confirmation by the Senate.(c) (1) The members of the council shall serve four-year terms. A member shall serve a maximum of two terms.(2) If the graduate-level researcher or postdoctoral scholar appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) earns their degree or completes their placement before the conclusion of their four-year term, the graduate-level researcher or postdoctoral scholar may serve out the remainder of the academic year on the council. At the conclusion of the academic year, the Secretary of Government Operations shall appoint a current graduate-level researcher or postdoctoral scholar who may serve a four-year term or until they earn their degree or complete their placement.(3) If a vacancy occurs within a term, the Secretary of Government Operations shall appoint a replacement member within 45 days to serve the remainder of the term.(4) When a term expires, the Secretary of Government Operations shall appoint a member within 30 days. A member shall serve until their replacement is appointed.(5) A grant or a loan shall not be approved if there are more than six vacancies on the council.(d) A majority of the membership of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power of the board. If a vacancy or recusal in the council occurs, then a majority of the remaining members of the council constitutes a quorum.(e) Council members shall serve without compensation, but may receive reimbursement for travel and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.(f) (1) Unless prohibited by another law, including the Political Reform Act of 1974, a member may participate in a decision to approve or award a grant or loan to a person or entity for the purpose of research involving either a disease from which the member or their immediate family member suffers or a disease in which the member has an interest as a representative of a disease advocacy organization.(2) Notwithstanding any other law:(A) Service or employment as a trainee or member of the faculty or administration of the University of California, California State University, or the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities, or as a member of the California Council on Science and Technology, is not, by itself, inconsistent, incompatible, in conflict with, or inimical to the duties of the council member and shall not result in the automatic forfeiture of either office or position.(B) Service or employment as a representative or employee of a disease advocacy organization, a nonprofit academic and research institution, or a life science commercial entity is not inconsistent, incompatible, in conflict with, or inimical to the duties of the council member.(3) For purposes of Section 1090, the council may approve or award a grant or loan in which a member of the council is financially interested as long as the interested member recuses themself from making, participating in making, or attempting to use their official position to influence a decision on the grant or loan. If this condition is satisfied, this transaction shall be deemed not to create a violation of Section 1090.(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “decision” does not include the adoption of standards.11899.4. (a) The council may establish one or more scientific peer review panels consisting of experts in the fields described in subdivision (b) of Section 11899.1 for the purposes of reviewing and prioritizing proposals on the basis of the scientific merit of the proposal, the potential benefits to the health and well-being of the population, natural resources, and environment of the state, and the demonstrated background, training, and expertise, as appropriate for their career stage, of the researchers and investigators to conduct the proposed work.(b) An expert on a scientific review panel shall not have a collaborative or commercial relationship with any applicant of a proposal for funding that the expert is reviewing and prioritizing pursuant to subdivision (a).11899.5. (a) The foundation shall issue an annual report that sets forth the foundation’s activities, grants awarded, loans made available, grants and loans in progress, research accomplishments, and future program directions. The annual report shall be published on the foundation’s internet website. (b) Each annual report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) The number and dollar amounts of research and facilities grants and loans.(2) The grantees and loan recipients for the prior year.(3) The foundation’s administrative expenses.(4) An assessment of the availability of funding for research from sources other than the foundation.(5) A summary of research findings, including promising new research areas.(6) An assessment of the relationship between the foundation’s grants and loans and the overall strategy of its research program.(7) A report of the foundation’s strategic research and financial plans.11899.6. The foundation shall annually commission an independent financial audit of its activities from a certified public accounting firm, which shall be provided to the Controller, who shall review the audit and annually issue a public report of that review. The Controller shall hold a public meeting with appropriate notice and a formal public comment period. The Controller shall evaluate public comments and shall include appropriate summaries in the annual report.11899.7. (a) The Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1) shall apply to all meetings of the council and a scientific peer review panel created pursuant to Section 11899.4, except as otherwise provided in this section. The council shall disclose all awarded grants in public meetings, shall award all grants, loans, and contracts in public meetings. The council and a scientific peer review panel created pursuant to Section 11899.4 shall adopt all governance, scientific, medical, and regulatory standards in public meetings.(b) The council and a scientific peer review panel created pursuant to Section 11899.4 may conduct closed sessions as permitted by the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1) under Section 11126. In addition, the council and a scientific peer review panel created pursuant to Section 11899.4 may conduct closed sessions when it meets to consider or discuss any of the following:(1) Matters involving information relating to patients or medical or scientific research subjects, the disclosure of which would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.(2) Matters involving confidential intellectual property or a work product, whether patentable or not, including, but not limited to, any formula, plan, pattern, process, tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production data, or compilation of information that is not patented, that is known only to certain individuals who are using it to fabricate, produce, or compound an article of trade or a service having commercial value, and that gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who do not know it or use it.(3) Matters involving scientific data, analyses, or other research products not yet formally published in academic literature.(4) Matters concerning the appointment, employment, performance, compensation, or dismissal of foundation officers and employees. Action on compensation of the foundation’s officers and employees shall only be taken in open session.(5) Matters believed to pose a security risk to the people of California. Article 2. California Foundation for Science and Health Research Bonds11899.10. The proceeds of bonds, excluding those issued in accordance with Section 11899.23, 11899.21, issued and sold pursuant to this article chapter shall be deposited into the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund. All moneys in the fund, notwithstanding Section 13340, are hereby continuously appropriated without respect to fiscal years for the purposes of this chapter.11899.11.The sum of ____ dollars ($____) shall be available for grants and loans to fund the construction and acquisition of facilities for research as provided in this chapter.11899.12.11899.11. (a) The sum of ____ dollars ($____) Moneys in the fund shall be available for all both of the following:(1) Grants and loans to fund research and operate and maintain facilities for research as provided in this chapter.(2) Paying general administrative costs of the foundation, not to exceed 3 percent of the amount in the fund.(3)Paying the annual administration costs of the interim debt or bonds after December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect.(4)Paying the costs of issuing interim debt, paying the annual administration costs of the interim debt until and including December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect, and paying interest on interim debt, if that interim debt is incurred or issued on or before December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect.(5)Paying the costs of issuing bonds, paying the annual administration costs of the bonds until and including December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect, and paying interest on bonds that accrues on or before December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect, except that this limitation does not apply to premium and accrued interest as provided in Section 11899.22.(6)Moneys in the fund or other proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by this article may be used to pay principal of or redemption premium on any interim debt issued before the issuance of bonds authorized by this article. Moneys deposited into the fund from the proceeds of interim debt may be used to pay general administrative costs of the foundation without regard to the 3-percent limit set forth in paragraph (2), so long as the 3-percent limit is satisfied for each issue of bonds.(b) Repayment of principal and interest on any loans made by the foundation pursuant to this article chapter shall be deposited into the fund and used to make additional grants and loans for the purposes of this act or for paying continuing costs of the annual administration of outstanding bonds.(c)Costs allowable under this section include costs incidentally but directly related to construction or acquisition, including, but not limited to, planning, engineering, construction management, architectural, and other design work, environmental impact reports and assessments, required mitigation expenses, appraisals, legal expenses, site acquisitions, and necessary easements.11899.13.11899.12. The proceeds of interim debt and bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Fund, except to the extent that proceeds of the issuance of bonds are used directly to repay interim debt. Fund.11899.14.11899.13. (a) Bonds in the total amount of twenty-three twelve billion dollars ($23,000,000,000), ($12,000,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 11899.23, 11899.21, may be issued and sold for the purposes expressed in this article chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5. The bonds, when sold, issued, and delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.(b) The Treasurer shall issue and sell the bonds authorized in subdivision (a) in the amount determined by the committee to be necessary or desirable pursuant to Section 11899.15. 11899.16. The bonds shall be issued and sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731. 11899.15.11899.14. (a) The bonds authorized by this article chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4), as amended from time to time, and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this article chapter and are hereby incorporated in this article chapter as though set forth in full in this article, chapter, except that subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 shall not apply. apply to restrict the use of bond proceeds to finance the operation and maintenance of facilities as provided in Section 11899.11.(b) For purposes of this article, chapter, the references to “committee” in the State General Obligation Bond Law shall mean the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Finance Committee created in Section 11899.16, 11899.15, and the references to “board” in the State General Obligation Bond Law shall mean the California Foundation for Science and Health Research. Research, established by Section 11899.1.11899.16.11899.15. (a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds and interim debt authorized by this article, chapter, the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Finance Committee is hereby created.(b) (1) The committee consists of all of the following:(A) The Treasurer.(B) The Controller.(C) The Director of Finance.(D) The Director of the California Foundation for Science and Health Research.(E) Two members of the California Foundation for Science and Health Research Council, chosen by the Secretary of Government Operations, or their designated representatives.(2) The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, any member may designate a representative to act as that member in the member’s place for all purposes, as though the member were personally present.(c) The committee shall act independently of the foundation and council, but may request recommendations and relevant information so as to understand the financial needs of the foundation to accomplish the strategic objectives and research priorities established pursuant to Section 11899.3.11899.17.(a)11899.16. The committee, by resolution, shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue and sell bonds authorized pursuant to this article chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in this article chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time. The bonds may bear interest, which is includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes if the committee determines that the treatment is necessary in order to provide funds for the purposes of the act.(b)An interest-only floating rate bond structure will be implemented for interim debt and bonds until at least December 31 of the fifth full calendar year after this article takes effect, with all interest to be paid from proceeds from the sale of interim debt or bonds, to minimize debt service payable from the General Fund during the initial period of basic research and development, if the committee determines, with the advice of the Treasurer, that this structure will result in the lowest achievable borrowing costs for the state during that five-year period considering the objective of avoiding any bond debt service payments, by the General Fund, during that period. Upon the initial determination, the committee may delegate, by resolution, to the Treasurer the authority in connection with issuance of bonds as it may determine, including, but not limited to, the authority to do both of the following:(1)Implement and continue the bond financing structure established by this article, including during any time following the initial five-year period.(2)Determine that an alternative financing plan would result in significant lower borrowing costs for the state consistent with the objectives related to the General Fund and to implement that alternative financing plan.11899.18.11899.17. There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds becoming due each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.11899.19.11899.18. Notwithstanding Section 13340, there is hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this article chapter and without regard to fiscal years, an amount that equals the total of both of the following: the sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.(a)The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article, as the principal and interest become due and payable.(b)The sum necessary to carry out Section 11899.20.11899.20.The foundation may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312, for the purposes of carrying out this article less any amount withdrawn pursuant to Section 11899.21 and not yet returned to the General Fund. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 11899.23, less any amount loaned pursuant to this section and not yet repaid and any amount withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to Section 11899.21 and not yet returned to the General Fund. The foundation shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited into the fund to be allocated by the foundation in accordance with this article.11899.21.11899.19. For the purposes purpose of carrying out this article, chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount, not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee, to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, chapter, excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 11899.23, less any amount loaned pursuant to Section 11899.20 and not yet repaid, 11899.21 and any amount withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section and not yet returned to the General Fund. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited into the fund. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article. chapter.11899.22.11899.20. All moneys deposited into the fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this article chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except those amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of bond issuance before any transfer to the General Fund.11899.23.11899.21. The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this article chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this article chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing that refunded bond.11899.24.11899.22. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this article chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, under designated conditions, or is otherwise entitled to any federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment of earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds or earnings required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.11899.25.11899.23. The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIII B of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.SEC. 3. The provisions of this act are severable. If any portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of this act is for any reason held to be invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act. The people of the State of California hereby declare that they would have adopted this act and each and every portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, and application not declared invalid or unconstitutional without regard to whether any portion of this act or application thereof would be subsequently declared invalid.SEC. 4. Section 2 of this act shall take effect upon the approval by the voters of the California Science and Health Research Bond Act, as set forth in Section 2 of this act.SEC. 5. Section 2 of this act shall be submitted to the voters at the next statewide election in accordance with provisions of the Government Code and the Elections Code governing the submission of a statewide measure to the voters.SEC. 6. This act shall be broadly construed to accomplish its purposes. The statutory provisions of the act may be amended so long as those amendments are consistent with and further the intent of this act by a statute that is passed by a two-thirds vote of the members of each house of the Legislature and signed by the Governor.SEC. 7. (a) This act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.(b) If this measure is approved by the voters but superseded in whole or in part by a conflicting measure approved by the voters at the same election, and the conflicting measure is later held to be invalid, this measure shall be self-executing and given full force and effect.SEC. 8. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 2 of this act, which adds Section 11899.7 to the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:To protect the privacy rights and the intellectual property interests of individuals and the security of the public, it is necessary to restrict the public’s access to this information.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 10.___________________